California statutes. Education Code
 funds, up to the reserve account maximum. For purposes of this section, “earned funds” are those for which the required number of eligible service units have been provided.

(b) (1) Earned funds shall not be expended for activities proscribed by Section 8315. Earned but unexpended funds shall remain in the contractor’s reserve account within the child development fund and shall be expended only by programs that are funded under contract with the department.

(2) A California state preschool program contracting agency may retain a reserve fund balance equal to 15 percent of the sum of the maximum reimbursable amounts of all California state preschool program contracts, or two thousand
 dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater.

(c) Each contractor’s audit shall identify any funds earned by the contractor for each contract through the provision of contracted services in excess of funds expended.

(d) Any interest earned on reserve funds shall be included in the fund balance of the reserve. This reserve fund shall be
 maintained in an interest-bearing account.

(e) Moneys in a contractor’s reserve fund may be used only for expenses that are reasonable and necessary costs as defined in Section 8205.

(f) Any reserve fund balance in excess of the amount authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be returned to the department pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(g) Upon termination of all child development contracts between a contractor and the department, all moneys in a contractor’s reserve fund shall be returned to the department pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(h) Expenditures from, additions to, and balances in, the reserve fund shall be included in the contracting agency’s annual financial statements and audit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8450 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 230.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Inclusive Early Education Expansion [8337. - 8337.]

8337.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Early childhood inclusion embodies the values, policies, and practices that support the right of every infant and young child and their family, regardless of ability, to participate in a broad range of activities and contexts as full members of families, communities, and society. The desired results of inclusive experiences for children with and without disabilities and their families include a sense of belonging and membership, positive social relationships and friendships, and development and learning to reach their full potential. The defining features of inclusion that can be used to identify high-quality early childhood programs and services are access, participation, and supports.

(2) In accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), all young children with exceptional needs should have access to inclusive high-quality early care and education programs where they are able to learn alongside children who do not have exceptional needs and are provided with individualized and appropriate supports to enable them to meet high expectations.

(3) Inclusive early care and education programs can improve a child’s developmental progress and educational outcomes, especially for children with exceptional needs.

(4) Interventions provided to children with exceptional needs, including children who are at risk of requiring services for pupils with exceptional needs, can be more effective when a child is younger.

(5) Access to inclusive early care and education programs benefits communities and families, especially when programs are coordinated with public elementary and secondary education systems to create a developmental and educational continuum of support.

(b) The Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program is hereby established for the purpose of increasing access to inclusive early care and education programs.

(c) The sum of one hundred sixty-seven million two hundred forty-two thousand dollars ($167,242,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for allocation to local educational agencies for the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program pursuant to this section. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2023.

(d) The sum of two hundred fifty million
 dollars ($250,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for allocation to local educational agencies for the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program pursuant to this section. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2027.

(e) The department’s divisions for special education and early education programs shall work collaboratively to administer the program, including developing criteria for the selection of grantees.

(f) At a minimum, an applicant shall be a local educational agency and shall include all of the following information in its grant application:

(1) A proposal to increase access to subsidized inclusive early care and education programs for children up to five years of age, including those defined as “children with exceptional needs” pursuant to
 Section 8205, in low-income and high-need communities. “High-need” shall be defined pursuant to the county childcare needs assessment specified in Section 10486 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and other factors as determined by the Superintendent. The proposal shall quantify the number of additional subsidized children proposed to be served, including children with exceptional needs.

(2) A plan to fiscally sustain subsidized spaces or programs created by grant funds beyond the grant period. Subsidies may be funded with private, local, state, or federal funds, but shall be able to demonstrate a reasonable expectation of sustainability.

(3) (A) The identification of local resources to contribute 33 percent of the total award amount. The total award amount shall include state and local resources. Local resources may include in-kind contributions.

(B) A school district shall provide 33 percent of the cost of the project. This subparagraph shall not apply to a school district that self-certifies that it meets the requirements for financial hardship pursuant to Section 17075.10.

(4) The identification of resources necessary to support lead agency professional development to allow staff to develop the knowledge and skills required to implement effective inclusive practices and fiscal sustainability.

(5) A description of the special education expertise that will be used to ensure the funds are used in a high-quality, inclusive manner.

(g) This section does not prohibit a local educational agency from applying on behalf of a consortium of providers within the local educational agency’s program area,
 including public and private agencies that will provide inclusive early care and education programs on behalf of the applicant.

(h) Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis. Priority shall be given to all of the following:

(1) Applicants with a demonstrated need for expanded access to inclusive early care and education.

(2) Applicants in low-income communities and applicants that represent a consortium of local partners, including local special education partners and those with expertise in inclusive early learning and care environments.

(3) Applicants who demonstrate the ability to serve a broad range of disabilities.

(4) Applicants who do or plan to serve children with disabilities
 in proportion to their rate of identification similar to local educational agencies in their region.

(i) Grants may be used for one-time infrastructure costs only, including, but not limited to, adaptive and universal design facility renovations, adaptive equipment, and professional development. Funds shall not be used for ongoing expenditures.

(j) A grant recipient shall commit to provide program data and participate in overall program evaluation to ensure expanded access to inclusive environments, as specified by the department, as a condition of the receipt of grant funding.

(k) The department may reserve up to 1 percent of the program funds to support an evaluation to address improved access, participation, and supports to inclusive early learning and care programs and program and child outcomes.

(l) Commencing in the 2018–19 fiscal year, the department shall convene a stakeholder workgroup that includes, but is not limited to, representatives from the relevant divisions in the department, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Interagency Coordinating Council on Early Intervention, local educational agencies, appropriate county agencies, regional centers, and resource and referral agencies. The workgroup shall be maintained through June 30, 2027, with the goal of providing continuous improvement in the inclusion of children with exceptional needs in early care and education settings. The department shall include representatives of local educational agencies participating in the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program established in this section and county offices of education in this workgroup, when appropriate, to share challenges, barriers, and best practices.

(m) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the Superintendent may allocate up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (d) to address state-level systems building and align local practice with the research and practice-based strategies that support inclusive fiscal and programmatic educational planning and best promote pupil outcomes and program quality. Specific activities shall include:

(1) Providing technical assistance, practice-based coaching, and job-embedded professional learning to support grantees, as necessary, around inclusion, social-emotional well-being of children, and strategies to leverage all available funding for inclusive environments in early
 education and to promote comprehensive fiscal and programmatic strategic planning at the local level.

(2) Developing culturally and linguistically responsive resources, as needed for grantees.

(3) Providing regional supports for early education inclusion integrated into a California state preschool program support system.

(4) Facilitation of the workgroup pursuant to subdivision (l).

(n) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount appropriated in subdivision (c) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts
 and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(o) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount appropriated in subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 7.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Head Start [8340. - 8340.]

8340.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Congress has recognized the importance of the transfer from preschool to primary school. Section 642A of Title VI of Subtitle A of Chapter 8 of Subchapter B of the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (P.L. 97-35) was enacted to require grantees of federal Head Start funds to take steps to coordinate with and involve the local educational agency serving the community, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Developing and implementing a systematic procedure for transferring, with parental consent, Head Start program records for each participating child to the school in which the child will enroll.

(2) Establishing channels of communication between Head Start staff and their counterparts in the schools, including, but not limited to, teachers, social workers, and health staff, to facilitate the coordination of programs.

(3) Conducting meetings involving parents, kindergarten or elementary school teachers, and Head Start program teachers to discuss the educational, developmental, and other needs of individual children.

(4) Organizing and participating in joint transition-related training of school staff and Head Start staff.

(5) Developing
 and implementing a family outreach and support program in cooperation with entities carrying out parental involvement efforts under Title I of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.).

(6) Assisting families, administrators, and teachers in enhancing educational and developmental continuity between Head Start services and elementary school classes.

(7) Linking the services provided in the Head Start program with the education services provided by the local educational agency.

(b) The superintendent shall advise local education agencies of these federal requirements.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8499.10 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 236.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. 21st Century High School After School Safety and Enrichment for Teens Program [8420. - 8428.]

8420.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the 21st Century High School After School Safety and Enrichment for Teens (High School ASSETs) program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1025, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8421.

There is hereby established the 21st Century High School After School Safety and Enrichment for Teens program. The purpose of the program is to create incentives for establishing locally driven after school enrichment programs that partner schools and communities to provide academic support and safe, constructive alternatives for high school pupils in the hours after the regular schoolday, and that support college and career readiness.

(a) High school after school programs shall serve pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(b) A high school after school program established pursuant to this article shall consist of the following two elements:

(1) (A) An academic assistance element that shall include, but need not be limited to, at least one of the following: tutoring, career exploration, homework assistance, or college preparation, including information about the Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3. The assistance shall be coordinated with the regular academic programs of the pupils.

(B) For purposes of this article, “career exploration” means activities that help pupils develop the knowledge and skills that are relevant to their career interests and reinforce academic content.

(2) An enrichment element that may include, but need not be limited to, community
 service, career and technical education, job readiness, opportunities for mentoring and tutoring younger pupils, service learning, arts, computer and technology training, physical fitness, and recreation activities.

(c) A program shall operate for a minimum of 15 hours per week.

(d) An entity may operate programs on one or multiple sites. If an entity plans to operate programs at multiple sites, only one application is required.

(e) A program may operate on a schoolsite or on another site approved by the department during the grant application process. A program located off school grounds shall not be approved unless both of the following criteria are met:

(1) Safe transportation is available to transport participating pupils if necessary.

(2) The program is at least as available and accessible as similar programs conducted on schoolsites.

(f) Applicants for grants pursuant to this article shall ensure that all of the following requirements are fulfilled, if applicable:

(1) The application includes a description of the activities that will be available for pupils and lists the program hours.

(2) The application includes an estimate of the following:

(A) The number of pupils expected to attend the program on a regular basis.

(B) The average hours of attendance per pupil.

(C) The percentage of pupils expected to attend the program less than three days a week, three days a week, and more than three days a week, for each quarter or semester during the grant period.

(3) The application documents the commitments of each partner to operate a program at a location or locations that are safe and accessible to participating pupils.

(4) The application certifies that pupils were involved in the design of the program and describes the extent of that involvement.

(5) The application identifies federal, state, and local programs that will
 be combined or coordinated with the high school after school program for the most effective use of public resources, and describes a plan for implementing the high school after school program beyond federal grant funding.

(6) The application has been approved by the school district, or the charter school governing body, and the principal of each participating school for each schoolsite or other site.

(7) The application includes a certification that the applicant has complied with the requirement in subdivision (b) of Section 8422.

(8) The application includes a certification that each applicant or partner in the application agrees to do all of the following:

(A) Assume responsibility for the quality of the program.

(B) Follow all fiscal reporting and auditing standards required by the department.

(C) Provide the following information on participating pupils to the department:

(i) Schoolday attendance rates.

(ii) Program attendance.

(D) Acknowledge that program evaluations will be based upon the criteria in Section 8427.

(9) Certify that the applicant has complied with all federal requirements in preparing and submitting the application.

(g) The department shall not establish minimum attendance requirements for individual pupils.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent possible, the department require applicants to submit the information required by this section in a short and concise manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 1.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8421.5.

(a) (1) The department shall provide notice to all schools eligible for grants under this article of the availability of those grants as well as the application process.

(2) The department shall make the application available through its Internet Web site. The department shall periodically review the applications on a competitive basis for funding on dates determined by the department.

(b) The department shall review all applications for their inclusion of the requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 8421 and Section 8423.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 370, Sec. 2.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8422.

(a) Priority for funding pursuant to this article shall be given to programs that previously received funding pursuant to Section 8421, for expansion of existing grants up to the per site maximum established under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8426, or to replace expiring grants that have satisfactorily met their projected attendance goals.

(b) A program established pursuant to this article shall be planned through a collaborative process that includes parents, pupils, representatives of participating schools, governmental agencies, including city and county parks and recreation departments, community organizations, law enforcement, and, if appropriate, the private sector.

(c) Every pupil attending a school operating a program pursuant to this article is eligible to participate in the program, subject to program capacity. A program established pursuant to this article may charge family fees. Programs that charge family fees shall waive or reduce the cost of these fees for pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(d) A program established pursuant to this article shall have the option of operating under either of the following modes:

(1) After school only.

(2) After school and during any combination of before school, weekends, summer, intersession, and vacation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.   (AB 2615)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8423.

(a) (1) The department shall select grantees to participate in the 21st Century High School After School Safety and Enrichment for Teens program from among applicants that apply on forms and in a manner prescribed by the department. To the extent possible, the selection of applicants by the department shall result in an equitable distribution of grant awards to applicants in northern, southern, and central California, and in urban and rural areas of the state.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(A) “Central California” means California County Superintendents
 Educational Services Association regions five to eight, inclusive.

(B) “Northern California” means California County Superintendents Educational Services Association regions one to four, inclusive.

(C) “Southern California” means California County Superintendents Educational Services Association regions 9 to 11, inclusive.

(D) “Urban and rural areas” shall be as defined by the United States Census Bureau.

(b) The department shall consider the following criteria in awarding grants:

(1) Strength of the educational element and coordination with state academic standards and other academic
 interventions.

(2) Strength of the enrichment element.

(3) Evidence of community collaboration, including demonstrated support of the principal and staff from participating schools.

(4) A description of the manner in which programs will provide a safe physical and emotional environment and opportunities for relationship building, and promote active pupil engagement.

(5) A description of the manner in which the program design will be periodically reexamined in order to maintain strong pupil interest.

(6) A description of plans to attract pupils, particularly pupils considered at promise or in
 need of academic support, on a regular basis.

(c) The application shall certify all of the following:

(1) Completion of an assessment of pupils’ preferences for program activities.

(2) Access to, and availability of, computers and technology.

(3) Inclusion of a nutritional snack, meal, or both, and a physical activity element.

(4) That the program will meet all of the evaluation requirements.

(5) Fiscal accountability.

(6) Collection and use of pupil social, behavioral, or
 skill development data collection to support quality program improvement processes. These pupil data outcomes may relate to specific social-emotional competencies, including, but not necessarily limited to, social skills, self-control, academic mindset, perseverance, conflict resolution, and school connectedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 4.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8425.

(a) The department shall implement this program only to the extent that federal funds are appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of the program. It is the intent of the Legislature that available federal funds be appropriated annually for the program established pursuant to this article through the annual Budget Act.

(b) The department may spend up to 3 percent of the funds appropriated for purposes of this article to provide training by qualified and experienced personnel, to convene regular meetings among grantees, and to ensure quality program implementation and sustainability, including unscheduled site visits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 370, Sec. 5.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8426.

(a) (1) A grantee that establishes a program pursuant to this chapter is eligible to receive a five-year grant of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per year per site in a program, subject to semiannual attendance reporting. Funding for a grant shall be allocated in annual increments for a period of not more than five years, contingent upon the availability and appropriation of federal funds by the Legislature for those grants.

(2) The department shall notify new grantees of their award status and the dollar amount of the award, if any, in writing on or before May 15 of each year in which new grants are awarded. The grantee shall notify the department in writing of its acceptance of the grant.

(3) A first-year grant award shall be made no later than 60 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act and any authorizing legislation. A grant award for the second and subsequent fiscal years shall be made no later than 30 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act and any authorizing legislation.

(4) A grantee who receives funds pursuant to this article as part of a partnership or consortium may restructure the partnership or consortium if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) All partners or consortium members agree to the restructure.

(B) The new consortia or partnership structure, or structures, complies with the requirements of paragraph (8) of subdivision (f) of Section 8421, as applicable.

(C) There is no change in the school, or schools, served by the restructured partnership or consortium.

(D) The department agrees to the restructure.

(b) The department shall allocate 25 percent of the grant amount each year no later than 30 days after the grant award acceptance letter is received by the department.

(c) (1) Not more than 15 percent of each annual grant amount may be used by a grantee for administrative costs. For purposes of this article, administrative costs shall include indirect costs. Indirect costs shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

(A) The grantee’s indirect cost rate, as approved by the department for the appropriate fiscal year.

(B) Five percent of the state program funding received pursuant to this article.

(2) In addition to the funding allowed for administrative costs pursuant to paragraph (1), up to 15 percent of the first year’s annual grant award for each after school grant recipient may be used for startup costs.

(3) Funding made available pursuant to this subdivision shall not result in an increase in the total funding of a grantee above the approved grant amount.

(4) The cost of a program site supervisor may be included as direct services, provided that at least 85 percent of the site supervisor’s time is spent at the program site.

(d) Grantees are subject to semiannual attendance reporting during each year
 of the grant.

(1) The department shall provide technical support for development of a program improvement plan for grantees under either of the following conditions:

(A) If actual pupil attendance falls below 75 percent of the proposed levels in any year of the grant.

(B) If the grantee fails, in any year of the grant, to demonstrate measurable outcomes pursuant to Section 8427.

(2) If the actual pupil attendance falls below 75 percent of the proposed attendance level at the end of the second year of the grant, the department may reduce funding for the grantee.

(3) The department shall adjust the grant level of any school in the program that is under its proposed attendance level by more
 than 15 percent in each of two consecutive years.

(4) In any year, after the first grant-year period, that the actual attendance level of a school within the program falls below 75 percent of the proposed attendance level, the department shall perform a review of the program and may adjust the grant level as the department deems appropriate.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other law, the department may at any time terminate the grant of a school in a public school program that fails in three consecutive years to meet either of the following requirements:

(1) Demonstrate program outcomes pursuant to Section 8427.

(2) Attain 75 percent of its proposed attendance levels after having its program reviews and grant level
 adjusted by the department.

(f) The department shall create a process to allow a grantee to voluntarily lower its annual grant amount if one or more sites are unable to meet the proposed pupil attendance levels by the end of the second year of the grant.

(g) (1) The administrator of a program may supplement, but not supplant, existing funding for after school programs with grant funds awarded pursuant to this article.

(2) In addition to administrative costs, a program participant may expend up to the greater of 6 percent of its state funding or seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) to collect outcome data for evaluation and for reports to the department.

(3) All state funding awarded to a program pursuant to this article
 that remains after subtracting the administrative costs, startup costs, and outcome data costs authorized by subdivisions (c) and (d) shall be allocated to the program site for direct services to pupils.

(h) When determining grant award amounts after each grant year, the department may consider whether a program is operating consistent with the terms of its application, including whether the number of pupils served on a regular basis is consistent with the number estimated, and may consider the strength of any justifications or future plans offered by the program to address inconsistencies with the terms of the application. If the department finds that a program is not operating consistent with the terms of its application, the department may take appropriate action, including denying grant awards or reducing the level of grant funding.

(i) The department may withhold or terminate
 the grant allocation of any site or program that does not comply with audit resolutions, fiscal reporting, attendance reporting, or outcomes reporting requirements required by the department.

(j) If a program grantee is temporarily prevented from operating its entire program due to natural disaster, civil unrest, or imminent danger to pupils or staff, the department may approve a request by the grantee for pupil attendance credits equal to the average annual attendance that the grantee would have received if it had been able to operate its entire program during that time period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8426.5.

(a) (1) If there is a significant barrier to pupil participation in a program established pursuant to this article at the school of attendance, a grantee may request approval from the department to transfer program services to another schoolsite within the same local educational agency. The schoolsite to which the program will be transferred shall satisfy either of the following requirements:

(A) The schoolsite shall receive pupils from, and have a grant of the same type awarded pursuant to this article as, the transferring school.

(B) The schoolsite shall not have a 10-percent lower percentage of pupils eligible for
 free or reduced-price meals than the transferring school. If the proposed schoolsite is not yet open, feeder school free or reduced-price meal data, as determined by the department, shall be considered in evaluating the proposed transfer.

(2) The schoolsite shall not increase the funding at the proposed schoolsite above the maximum after school grant amount established under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8426. An applicant that requests approval to transfer program services shall describe the manner in which the applicant intends to provide safe, supervised transportation; ensure communication among teachers in the regular school program, staff in the before school and after school components of the program, and parents of pupils; and coordinate the educational and literacy component of the before and after school components of the program with the regular school programs of participating pupils.

(b) For purposes of this article, a significant barrier to pupil participation in the before or after school component of a program established pursuant to this chapter means any of the following:

(1) Fewer than 20 pupils participating in the component of the program.

(2) Extreme transportation constraints, including, but not limited to, desegregation bussing, bussing for magnet or open enrollment schools, or pupil dependence on public transportation.

(3) A local educational agency opens a new schoolsite and either merges an existing schoolsite into the new schoolsite or splits the existing schoolsite’s pupils with the new schoolsite so that the existing schoolsite after school program is subject to a grant reduction pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section
 8426.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, Sec. 4.   (AB 2615)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8427.

(a) A high school after school program established pursuant to this article shall submit to the department annual outcome-based data for evaluation.

(1) To demonstrate program effectiveness, grantees shall submit, using the unique statewide pupil identifiers for participating pupils who are unduplicated pupils, both of the following:

(A) Schoolday attendance on an annual basis.

(B) Program attendance on a semiannual basis.

(2) Programs shall submit evidence of a data-driven program quality improvement process that is based on the
 department’s guidance on program quality standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3).

(3) The department may develop additional measures to demonstrate program effectiveness, including, but not limited to, program quality standards. Additions shall be developed in consultation with the advisory committee pursuant to Section 8484.9.

(4) Programs shall submit information to the department through the process used in subdivision (b) of Section 8421.5.

(b) (1) If a program consistently fails to demonstrate measurable program outcomes for three consecutive years, the department may terminate the program pursuant to the process described in subdivision (e) of Section 8426. The department shall consider multiple outcomes and not rely on one outcome in isolation.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “consistently fails to demonstrate measurable program outcomes” means failure to meet program effectiveness requirements pursuant to the criteria in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) Measurable program outcomes may be demonstrated by, but are not limited to, the following methods:

(A) Comparing pupils participating in the program to nonparticipating pupils at the same schoolsite.

(B) Pupils participating in the program demonstrate improvement on one or more indicators collected by the program pursuant to this section.

(c) The department shall identify or develop standardized procedures and tools to collect the indicators in paragraphs (1) and
 (2) of subdivision (a) in accordance with the recommendations made pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 8484.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, Sec. 5.   (AB 2615)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8428.

The department shall develop, and submit in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a biennial report to the Legislature related to the pupils attending, and the program quality of, expanded learning programs. The report shall include data that is derived by matching the unique statewide pupil identifiers with data in the department’s data systems. The report may also include, but is not necessarily limited to, aggregate reporting of all of the following information:

(a) The number, geographical distribution, and type of sites and grantees participating in expanded learning programs.

(b) Pupil program attendance and pupil schoolday attendance.

(c) Statewide test and assessment scores.

(d) Pupil demographics and characteristics.

(e) Pupil behavior changes and skill development.

(f) The quality of the programs, based on the department’s guidance on program quality standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 8427.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 370, Sec. 9.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22.5. After School Learning and Safe Neighborhoods Partnerships Program [8483.3. - 8484.5.]

8483.3.

(a) The State Department of Education shall select applicants to participate in the program established pursuant to this article from among applicants that apply on forms and in a manner prescribed by the department. To the extent possible, the selection of applicants by the State Department of Education shall result in an equitable distribution of grant awards pursuant to Section 8483.7 to applicants in northern, southern, and central California, and in urban, suburban, and rural areas of California.

(b) The State Department of Education shall consider the following in selecting schools to participate in the program established pursuant to this article, with primary emphasis given to items (1) through (4):

(1) Strength of the educational component.

(2) Quality of the educational enrichment component.

(3) Strength of staff training and development component.

(4) Scope and strength of collaboration, including demonstrated support of the schoolsite principal and staff.

(5) Inclusion of a nutritional snack.

(6) Employment of CalWORKs recipients.

(7) Level and type of local matching funds.

(8) Capacity to respond to program evaluation requirements.

(9) Demonstrated fiscal accountability.

(c) The State Department of Education shall develop reporting requirements and allocation procedures, including procedures to reimburse startup costs for programs established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1998.   See the prevailing Section 8483.3 (added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320), as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, in the Article 22.5 commencing with Section 8482.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.9.

(a) A program participant receiving funding pursuant to this article may expend on indirect costs no more than the lesser of the following:

(1) The school district’s indirect cost rate, as approved by the State Department of Education for the appropriate fiscal year.

(2) Five percent of the state program funding received pursuant to this article.

(b) A program participant receiving state funding pursuant to this article may expend no more than 15 percent of that funding on administrative costs. For purposes of this section, administrative costs shall include indirect costs, as described in subdivision (a).

(c) A program participant receiving state funding pursuant to this program shall ensure that no less than 85 percent of that funding is allocated to schoolsites for direct services to pupils.
